Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.055

Authority of disciplining authority—Denial of applications.

(1) The disciplining authority may deny an application for licensure or grant a license with conditions if the applicant:

(a) Has had his or her license to practice any health care profession suspended, revoked, or restricted, by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, except as provided in RCW 18.130.450;

(b) Has committed any act defined as unprofessional conduct for a license holder under RCW 18.130.180, except as provided in RCW 9.97.020 and 18.130.450;

(c) Has been convicted or is subject to current prosecution or pending charges of a crime involving moral turpitude or a crime identified in RCW 43.43.830, except as provided in RCW 9.97.020, 18.205.097, and 18.19.095. For purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the prosecution or sentence has been deferred or suspended. At the request of an applicant for an original license whose conviction is under appeal, the disciplining authority may defer decision upon the application during the pendency of such a prosecution or appeal;

(d) Fails to prove that he or she is qualified in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the chapters identified in RCW 18.130.040(2), or the rules adopted by the disciplining authority; or

(e) Is not able to practice with reasonable skill and safety to consumers by reason of any mental or physical condition.

(i) The disciplining authority may require the applicant, at his or her own expense, to submit to a mental, physical, or psychological examination by one or more licensed health professionals designated by the disciplining authority. The disciplining authority shall provide written notice of its requirement for a mental or physical examination that includes a statement of the specific conduct, event, or circumstances justifying an examination and a statement of the nature, purpose, scope, and content of the intended examination. If the applicant fails to submit to the examination or provide the results of the examination or any required waivers, the disciplining authority may deny the application.

(ii) An applicant governed by this chapter is deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental, physical, or psychological examination when directed in writing by the disciplining authority and further to have waived all objections to the admissibility or use of the examining health professional's testimony or examination reports by the disciplining authority on the grounds that the testimony or reports constitute privileged communications.

(2) The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to a decision to deny a license under this section.

(3) The disciplining authority shall give written notice to the applicant of the decision to deny a license or grant a license with conditions in response to an application for a license. The notice must state the grounds and factual basis for the action and be served upon the applicant.

(4) A license applicant who is aggrieved by the decision to deny the license or grant the license with conditions has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The application for adjudicative proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the adverse action, include a copy of the adverse notice, and be served on and received by the department within twenty-eight days of the decision. The license applicant has the burden to establish, by a preponderance of evidence, that the license applicant is qualified in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the chapters identified in RCW 18.130.040(2), and the rules adopted by the disciplining authority.

[ 2023 c 192 s 1. Prior: 2019 c 446 s 46; 2019 c 444 s 24; 2016 c 81 s 12; 2008 c 134 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 192: See note following RCW 18.130.450.

Finding—Conflict with federal requirements—2016 c 81: See notes following RCW 9.97.010.

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.